Washington statutes.
RCW 43.97.035

Commission members—Compensation—Travel expenses.

Members of the Columbia River Gorge commission appointed for Washington shall receive compensation for their services pursuant to RCW 43.03.240, and shall be eligible to receive a subsistence allowance and travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

[ 1987 c 499 s 3.]